Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.045

Vacations—Provisions not applicable to officers and employees of state convention and trade center.

The provisions of RCW 43.01.040 through 43.01.044 shall not be applicable to the officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed under *chapter 67.40 RCW.

[ 1984 c 210 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: A majority of chapter 67.40 RCW was repealed by 2010 1st sp.s. c 15 s 14, effective November 30, 2010. RCW 67.40.020 was repealed by 2010 1st sp.s. c 15 s 15, effective December 30, 2010.

Savings—1984 c 210: "This act shall not terminate or modify any right acquired under a contract of employment in existence prior to March 27, 1984." [ 1984 c 210 s 7.]

Severability—1984 c 210: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1984 c 210 s 8.]